Florida, session 2026, SB1716.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âParagraph (ll) of subsection (6) of section 12 627.351, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 13 627.351âInsurance risk apportionment plans.â 14 (6)âCITIZENS PROPERTY INSURANCE CORPORATION.â 15 (ll)1.âIn addition to any other method of alternative 16 dispute resolution authorized by state law, the corporation may 17 adopt policy forms that provide for the resolution of disputes 18 regarding its claim determinations, including disputes regarding 19 coverage for, or the scope and value of, a claim, in a 20 proceeding before the Division of Administrative Hearings. Any 21 such policies are not subject to s. 627.70154. All proceedings 22 in the Division of Administrative Hearings pursuant to such 23 policies are subject to ss. 57.105 and 768.79 as if filed in the 24 courts of this state and are not considered chapter 120 25 administrative proceedings. Rule 1.442, Florida Rules of Civil 26 Procedure, applies to any offer served pursuant to s. 768.79, 27 except that, notwithstanding any provision in Rule 1.442, 28 Florida Rules of Civil Procedure, to the contrary, an offer 29 shall not be served earlier than 10 days after filing the 30 request for hearing with the Division of Administrative Hearings 31 and shall not be served later than 10 days before the date set 32 for the final hearing. The administrative law judge in such 33 proceedings shall award attorney fees and other relief pursuant 34 to ss. 57.105 and 768.79. The corporation may not seek, and the 35 office may not approve, a maximum hourly rate for attorney fees. 36 2.âThe corporation may contract with the division to 37 conduct proceedings to resolve disputes regarding its claim 38 determinations as may be provided for in the applicable policies 39 of insurance. This subparagraph expires July 1, 2026. 40 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.